Maryland, session 2025, HB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
4–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Ammunition” means a cartridge, shell, or other device containing
explosive or incendiary material designed and intended for use in a firearm.
(3) (i) “Firearm” means a handgun, rifle, shotgun, short–barreled rifle,
or short–barreled shotgun, as those terms are defined in § 4–201 of this title, or any other
firearm.
(ii) “Firearm” does not include an antique firearm as defined in §
4–201 of this title.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1518*

HOUSE BILL 1518
(b) This section does not apply if:
(1) the minor’s access to a firearm is supervised by an individual at least
18 years old;
(2) the minor’s access to a firearm was obtained as a result of an unlawful
entry;
(3) the firearm is in the possession or control of a law enforcement officer
while the officer is engaged in official duties; or
(4) the minor has a certificate of firearm and hunter safety issued under §
10–301.1 of the Natural Resources Article.
(c) A person may not store or leave a loaded firearm in a location where the person
knew or should have known that an unsupervised minor has access to the firearm.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR a fine not exceeding $1,000
OR BOTH.
(e) (1) A violation of this section may not:
(i) be considered evidence of negligence;
(ii) be considered evidence of contributory negligence;
(iii) limit liability of a party or an insurer; or
(iv) diminish recovery for damages arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or operation of a firearm or ammunition.
(2) A party, witness, or lawyer may not refer to a violation of this section
during a trial of a civil action that involves property damage, personal injury, or death.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.